District of Columbia statutes.
23-313

Relief from prejudicial joinder.

If it appears that a defendant or the government is prejudiced by a joinder of offenses or of defendants in an indictment or information or by such joinder for trial together, the court may order an election or separate trials of counts, grant a severance of defendants, or provide whatever other relief justice requires. In ruling on a motion by a defendant for severance the court may order the attorney for the government to deliver to the court for inspection in camera any statements or confessions made by the defendants which the government intends to introduce in evidence at the trial.

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 611, Pub. L. 91-358, title II, § 210(a)
1981 Ed., § 23-313.
1973 Ed., § 23-313.